District of Columbia statutes.
24-211.61

Limitation on Department of Corrections’ use of facilities on D.C. General Hospital Campus.

The Department of Corrections shall not house any misdemeanants, felons, ex-offenders, or persons awaiting trial or sentencing for offenses committed in the District of Columbia in any facility on the D.C. General Hospital Campus (Reservation 13) other than the District of Columbia Jail or the Correctional Treatment Facility. This limitation shall not prohibit the Department of Corrections from relocating its headquarters to any facility on Reservation 13 or using any Reservation 13 facility for the housing of records or training purposes.

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 3002, 49 DCR 6968

History

Establishment — Steering Committee for the Planning and Development of Hill East Waterfront, see Mayor’s Order 2002-157, September 13, 2002 ( 49 DCR 8627).

Mayor's Orders